Missouri, session 2026, SB1654.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 290, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
eight new sections, to be known as sections 290.160, 290.161,
290.162, 290.163, 290.164, 290.165, 290.166, and 290.167, to
read as follows:
290.160. As used in sections 290.161 to 290.167,
unless the context indicates otherwise, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence", a machine-based system
that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real
or virtual environments. Artificial intelligence systems
use machine and human-based inputs to:
(a) Perceive real and virtual environments;
(b) Abstract such perceptions into models through
analysis in an automated manner; and
(c) Use model inference to formulate options for
information or action;
(2) "Designated employee representative", any
representative designated by an employee, including an

SB 1654 2
employee representative that has a collective bargaining
relationship with the covered employer of the covered
employee. A designated employee representative shall not
include a worker's employer;
(3) "Employee", an individual who is employed at a
warehouse distribution center and who is not exempt from the
minimum wage and overtime requirements of the Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, as amended from time to time.
"Employee" does not include a driver or courier traveling to
or from a warehouse distribution center;
(4) "Employer", an individual, corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, business trust,
estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency,
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity,
whether domestic or foreign, that directly or indirectly, or
through an agent or any other person, including through the
services of a third-party employer, temporary services,
staffing agency, independent contractor or any similar
entity, at any time in the prior twelve months, employs or
exercises control over the wages, hours, or working
conditions of fifty or more employees at a single warehouse
distribution center in the state or one thousand or more
employees at one or more warehouse distribution centers in
the state;
(5) "Warehouse distribution center", an establishment
as defined by any of the following North American Industry
Classification System Codes, however such establishment is
denominated: (A) 493110 for General Warehousing and Storage;
(B) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods; (C) 424 for
Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods; (D) 454110 for

SB 1654 3
Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order Houses; or (E) 492110 for
Couriers and Express Delivery Services;
(6) "Work performance standard", an expectation set by
an employer for an employee;
(7) "Work speed data", information an employer
collects, stores, analyzes, or interprets relating to an
individual employee's work performance, including, but not
limited to, quantities of tasks performed, quantities of
items or materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of
tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee
performance, and time categorized as performing tasks or not
performing tasks. "Work speed data" does not include wage
statements or data an employer collects, stores, analyzes,
or interprets that does not relate to the work performance,
except for any content of such records that includes work
speed data.
290.161. 1. Upon hiring an employee, an employer
shall provide to such employee a written description of each
work performance standard to which such employee is subject,
including any potential adverse employment action that may
result from a failure to satisfy such work performance
standard. Such written description shall be provided to an
employer's current employees not later than October 1, 2026.
2. Whenever an employer makes a change to an existing
work performance standard for an employee, the employer
shall:
(1) Notify the employee of such change as soon as
possible, either verbally or in writing, and prior to the
effective date of such new standard;
(2) Provide the employee with a written description of
the new work performance standard to which such employee is

SB 1654 4
subject not later than two business days after the change is
made; and
(3) Any written description required pursuant to this
section shall be provided directly to an employee by a human
manager during such employee's work hours.
3. An employer shall not impose any work performance
standard that:
(1) Interferes with an employee's use of the bathroom
facilities, including reasonable travel time to and from the
bathroom facilities;
(2) Sets a performance standard that measures an
employee's total output over an increment of time that is
shorter than such employee's work day;
(3) Requires an employee to work for three or more
consecutive hours without a period of at least ten
consecutive minutes for a rest break, given at some time
after the first hour of work and before the last hour;
(4) Requires employees to work more than forty hours
in a seven-day period or ten hours in a twenty-four hour
period, unless the employee agrees in writing or in a
similar format and is paid a one hundred fifty dollar
premium in addition to their wages and any overtime premium
pay required under state or federal law;
(5) Requires employees to work consecutive shifts with
less than twelve hours of time elapsing between the shifts,
unless the employee agrees in writing or in a similar format
and is paid a one hundred fifty dollar premium in addition
to their wages; or
(6) Require an employee to perform duties outside of
the scope of such employee's regular job duties for more
than three hours a week.

SB 1654 5
4. An employer shall not take an adverse employment
action against an employee for failure to meet a work
performance standard that:
(1) Violates subsection 3 of this section;
(2) Was not described to the employee in accordance
with subsection 2 of this section;
(3) Is based solely on ranking the performance of the
employee in relation to the performance of another employee
or in relation to the past performance of that employee;
(4) Is based on continuously measuring, recording, or
tallying increments of time within a defined time period
during which an employee is or is not doing a particular
activity; or
(5) Is based primarily on work speed data collected
through automated electronic monitoring.
5. An employee may request to speak in person with a
human manager during such employee's work hours. An
employer shall assign a human manager authorized to make
decisions related to discipline to respond not later than
thirty minutes after such a request. An employee may not
make more than one request per every two hours under this
section.
6. An employer shall not discipline or terminate an
employee based on failure to meet a performance standard
unless it has provided prior written notice of such action.
Such notice shall include the following:
(1) A plain language description of the reasons for
the discipline or termination;
(2) The effective date of the discipline or
termination; and
(3) Any and all records relied upon to substantiate
the discipline or termination.

SB 1654 6
7. In the case of a termination based on failure to
meet a work performance standard, the employer shall notify
the employee of the termination of their employment at least
fourteen days before such termination becomes effective, as
well as upon the effective date of termination. The time
period between a first warning or discipline and termination
shall be not less than thirty days, and the employer may not
rely on a warning or discipline issued more than one year in
the past to justify a termination.
290.162. 1. (1) Each employer shall establish,
maintain, and preserve contemporaneous, true, and accurate
records of the following:
(a) Each individual employee's work performance
records;
(b) The aggregated work performance records for
similar employees at the same warehouse distribution center;
(c) The work performance standard provided to each
employee pursuant to section 290.161; and
(d) The written notice provided to a terminated
employee pursuant to subsection 8 of section 290.161.
(2) The records required by this subsection shall be
maintained for a period of three years. Nothing in this
section shall require an employer to establish, maintain,
and preserve the records required pursuant to this section
if such employer does not assign or require work performance
standards or collect, store, analyze, or interpret work
performance data.
2. An employee, or a designated employee
representative of such employee, may request from such
employee's employer:
(1) A written description of the work performance
standard the employee is subject to;

SB 1654 7
(2) A copy of the employee's personal work speed data
for the prior ninety days;
(3) A copy of aggregated work speed data for similar
employees at the same warehouse distribution center for the
prior ninety days; and
(4) Any notices of discipline issued to such employee
in the prior year.
3. (1) A former employee, or a designated employee
representative of such employee, may request from a former
employer:
(a) A written description of each work performance
standard the employee was subject to for the ninety days
prior to the employee's separation from employment with such
employer;
(b) A copy of the employee's personal work speed data
for the ninety days prior to such employee's separation from
employment with such employer;
(c) A copy of aggregated work speed data for similar
employees at the same warehouse distribution center for the
ninety days prior to such employee's separation from
employment with such employer; and
(d) Any notices of discipline issued to such former
employee in the calendar year prior to the termination.
(2) A former employee may only make one request under
this section.
4. An employer shall provide a written copy of any
records requested pursuant to this section not later than
five calendar days after receipt of such request. Such
written copy shall be provided:
(1) In both English and the primary language of the
employee requesting such records; and

SB 1654 8
(2) (a) For a current employee, directly to the
employee requesting such records by a manager during such
employee's work hours; or
(b) For a former employee, either at a mutually
convenient time or via a mutually convenient delivery method.
290.163. 1. An employer shall not commence a
reduction of force resulting in an employment loss at a
single site of employment during any thirty day period for
fifty or more employees unless such employer has offered a
new employment position to each employee who may reasonably
be expected to experience an employment loss as a
consequence of such a reduction in force. Such a position
shall be:
(1) Comparable with regard to wages, hours, benefits,
working conditions, and job duties;
(2) Within a reasonable commuting distance from the
affected site of employment; and
(3) Offered in writing at least thirty days prior to
the commencement of such a reduction in force.
2. If an employer discharges an employee, the employer
shall pay the employee two weeks of severance pay plus an
additional day of severance pay for each two months that the
employee has worked for the employer. One week of severance
pay shall be calculated based on the employee's average
weekly earnings including overtime pay received during the
employee's most recent twelve months of employment, or
received during the duration of the employee's employment if
the duration of the employment has been less than twelve
months. A day of severance pay shall be equal to one week
of severance pay divided by five.

SB 1654 9
290.164. 1. An employer shall not discharge or in any
way retaliate, discriminate, or take any adverse action
against any employee or former employee for:
(1) Making a request pursuant to section 290.161 or
290.162;
(2) Declining to work more than forty hours in a week,
more than ten hours in a day, or consecutive shifts with
less than twelve hours between the shifts; or
(3) Filing a civil action pursuant to section 290.165.
2. If an employer discharges or in any way retaliates,
discriminates, or takes any adverse action against any
employee or former employee within ninety days after such
employee engages in or attempts to engage in the activities
described in subsection 1 of this section, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that such adverse action is in
violation of this section. Such presumption may be rebutted
by clear and convincing evidence that the:
(1) Adverse action was taken for other permissible
reasons; and
(2) Employee engaging or attempting to engage in the
activities described in subsection 1 of this section was not
a motivating factor in the employer taking such adverse
action.
290.165. 1. (1) An employee aggrieved by a violation
of sections 290.161 to 290.164, or the attorney general on
behalf of an employee aggrieved by a violation of sections
290.161 to 290.164, may bring a civil action in circuit
court or any other court of competent jurisdiction to
recover damages, civil penalties, and such equitable and
injunctive relief as the court deems appropriate. An
employer who violates the provisions of sections 290.161 to
290.164 shall be liable to a plaintiff for statutory damages

SB 1654 10
of not less than five thousand dollars nor more than seven
thousand five hundred dollars per violation in addition to
economic damages. A court shall have discretion to
determine the amount in light of the severity of the
violation and any history of prior violations. A
complainant who prevails in such a civil action shall be
awarded reasonable attorney's fees and costs to be taxed by
the court. An employer who violates a provision of section
290.161 to 290.164 may be assessed a civil penalty by the
court of:
(a) One thousand dollars for a first violation;
(b) Two thousand dollars for a second violation; or
(c) Three thousand dollars for a third or subsequent
violations.
(2) An employer who fails to pay in full required
severance pay shall be liable for payment of the required
severance pay, plus an additional two times the unpaid
amount as liquidated damages.
2. The director of the department of labor and
industrial relations shall monitor the injury rates of
employees working in warehouse distribution centers in the
state. If an employer is found to have an annual injury
rate at or over one and one-half times the average annual
injury rate for the relevant North American Industry
Classification System Codes, based on data reported to the
federal Occupational and Safety and Health Administration,
the director of the department of labor and industrial
relations shall determine whether an investigation
concerning potential violations of sections 290.161 to
290.164 is appropriate.
290.166. 1. Not more than thirty days after the last
day of each quarter, an employer shall, with respect to the

SB 1654 11
preceding quarter, disclose to the director of the
department of labor and industrial relations any artificial
intelligence-related job impact experienced by the entity in
the state of Missouri, including:
(1) The number of individuals laid off by the employer
in the state of Missouri during the quarter that are
substantially due to the replacement or automation by
artificial intelligence of the functions performed by such
individuals;
(2) The number of individuals hired by the employer in
the state of Missouri during the quarter that are
substantially due to the incorporation of artificial
intelligence;
(3) The number of positions at the employer's
establishments in the state of Missouri that were occupied
at any point during the prior quarter for which the employer
has decided not to fill based on a reason that is
substantially due to the replacement or automation by
artificial intelligence of the functions of such positions;
(4) The number of individuals in the state of Missouri
whom the employer is retraining, or assisting in retraining,
based on a reason that is substantially due to artificial
intelligence; and
(5) Any other information related to artificial
intelligence-related job impacts, as determined appropriate
by the director at the department of labor and industrial
relations.
2. With respect to each artificial intelligence-
related job impact disclosure under section 290.166, the
employer shall provide in such disclosure the corresponding
North American Industry Classification System Codes.

SB 1654 12
3. The director of the department of labor and
industrial relations shall impose civil monetary penalties
on an employer in violation of this section as follows. For
each violation, a penalty of five hundred dollars shall be
imposed. In the case of willful or repeated violations, an
additional amount of not less than one thousand dollars and
not more than three thousand dollars shall be imposed.
4. The director of the department of labor and
industrial relations shall:
(1) For each quarter, prepare a report summarizing the
data from disclosures submitted under subsection 1 of this
section during the quarter; and for the quarter ending on
December thirty-first, summarizing such data for the
calendar year;
(2) For every other quarter, prepare a report
analyzing the net impact of the data contained in the report
under subdivision (1) of this subsection for such quarter
and for the preceding quarter, and any other relevant data
available to the director of the department of labor and
industrial relations with respect to artificial intelligence-
related job impacts; and
(3) Not more than sixty days after the last day of
each quarter publish each report prepared for the quarter
under subdivision (1) of this subsection and, as applicable,
subdivision (2) of this subsection, and the data underlying
such reports on the website of the department of labor and
industrial relations; and submit each such report to the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president
pro tempore of the senate.
290.167. Effective July 1, 2027, and each subsequent
July first after that, the director of the department of
labor and industrial relations shall increase all of the

SB 1654 13
dollar amounts specified in sections 290.161 to 290.166 in
proportion to the increase, if any, during the most recent
twelve month period for which data is available when the
increase is announced, in the consumer price index for all
urban wage earners and clerical workers on a national and
seasonally unadjusted basis (CPI-W), or a successor index,
as calculated by the United States Department of Labor or a
successor agency. Such increases shall be announced by
April 1, 2027, and by April first of subsequent years.
✓